Illinois, session 104th, HB3060.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Commission to End Gun Violence in Disproportionately Impacted 6Areas Act. 7    Section 5. Definition. As used in this Act, 8"Disproportionately Impacted Area" means a census tract or 9comparable geographic area that the Department of Commerce and 10Economic Opportunity determines: 11        (1) has high rates of arrest, conviction, and 12    incarceration related to gun violence; and13        (2) meets at least one of the following criteria: 14            (A) the area has a poverty rate of at least 20% 15        according to the latest federal decennial census; 16            (B) 75% or more of the children in the area 17        participate in the federal free lunch program 18        according to reported statistics from the State Board 19        of Education; 20            (C) at least 20% of the households in the area 21        receive assistance under the Supplemental Nutrition 22        Assistance Program; or 23            (D) the area has an average unemployment rate, as   HB3060- 2 -LRB104 10467 SPS 20542 b1        determined by the Department of Employment Security, 2        that is more than 120% of the national unemployment 3        average, as determined by the United States Department 4        of Labor, for a period of at least 2 consecutive 5        calendar years preceding the effective date of this 6        Act. 7    Section 10. Establishment of Commission. 8    (a) The Commission to End Gun Violence in 9Disproportionately Impacted Areas is established. 10    (b) The Commission shall consist of the following members: 11        (1) the Executive Director of the Illinois Criminal 12    Justice Information Authority, or the Executive Director's 13    designee, who shall serve as Chair; 14        (2) the Director of Children and Family Services, or 15    the Director's designee; 16        (3) the Director of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, 17    or the Director's designee; 18        (4) the Secretary of Human Services, or the 19    Secretary's designee; 20        (5) the State Superintendent of Education, or the 21    Superintendent's designee; 22        (6) the Director of the Illinois Housing Development 23    Authority, or the Director's designee; and 24        (7) the following members, appointed by the Governor 25    with the advise and consent of the Senate:   HB3060- 3 -LRB104 10467 SPS 20542 b1            (A) one elected county official representing a 2        Disproportionately Impacted Area; 3            (B) one elected State official representing a 4        Disproportionately Impacted Area; 5            (C) one elected federal official representing a 6        Disproportionately Impacted Area; 7            (D) one representative of the Chicago Police 8        Department; 9            (F) one representative of a municipal police 10        department located in a Disproportionately Impacted 11        Area; 12            (G) 2 representatives of non-profit organizations 13        with budgets over $1,000,000 that primary work 14        directly on violence reduction; 15            (H) 3 representatives of non-profit organizations 16        with budgets under $1,000,000 that primary work 17        directly on violence reduction; 18            (I) 2 representatives of non-profit organizations 19        that primary engage in street level violence reduction 20        and outreach to at-risk individuals; 21            (J) 3 members employed by news media organizations 22        in the top 5 news media markets nationwide, as 23        determined by Nielsen Media Research, who live in a 24        Disproportionately Impacted Area; 25            (K) one member employed by a news media 26        organization in Illinois who lives in a   HB3060- 4 -LRB104 10467 SPS 20542 b1        Disproportionately Impacted Area; and 2            (L) 10 residents of this State that reside in 3        Disproportionately Impacted Areas that have 4        experienced high rates of gun violence for at least 5        the previous 10 years. 6    (c) Terms of the members shall be 4 years. Members shall 7serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. Any 8vacancy in the membership of the Commission shall be filled by 9the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate for the 10unexpired term. Members shall serve without compensation, but 11may be reimbursed for reasonable expenses. 12    (d) The Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 13shall provide administrative and other support to the 14Commission. The Illinois State Police Division of Justice 15Services shall also provide support to the Commission. 16    Section 15. Purposes of Commission. The purpose of the 17Commission is to study, analyze data, make recommendations, 18and develop policy proposals addressing the root causes of 19violence and resulting trauma to drastically reduce gun 20violence in Disproportionately Impacted Areas. 21    Section 20. Annual report. The Commission shall submit a 22report to the Governor and the General Assembly no later than 23July 1, 2026, and each year thereafter. The report shall, at a 24minimum, include detailed findings and recommendations related   HB3060- 5 -LRB104 10467 SPS 20542 b1to the reduction of gun violence in Disproportionately 2Impacted Areas. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.